Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5552.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the price of introductory housing has become unaffordable for homebuyers of modest means. As a result, the legislature intends to create the kit home category of building codes to provide for a small home that is affordable for more homebuyers.Sec. 2. RCW 19.27.015 and 2024 c 170 s 9 and 2024 c 19 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:As used in this chapter:(1) "Agricultural structure" means a structure designed and constructed to house farm implements, hay, grain, poultry, livestock, or other horticultural products. This structure may not be a place of human habitation or a place of employment where agricultural products are processed, treated, or packaged, nor may it be a place used by the public.(2) "Approval," "approved," or "adopted," unless otherwise defined or otherwise indicated by context, means an affirmative vote by a majority of voting members of the council, committee, or advisory group present at the time of the vote.(3) "City" means a city or town.(4) "Commercial building permit" means a building permit issued by a city or a county to construct, enlarge, alter, repair, move, demolish, or change the occupancy of any building not covered by a residential building permit.(5) "Emergency statewide amendment" means any proposed statewide amendment meeting the criteria in RCW 34.05.350. A rule shall be considered an emergency rule if the council, for good cause, finds that immediate adoption or amendment of a rule is necessary for the preservation of the public health, safety, or general welfare, and that observing the time requirements of notice and opportunity to comment upon adoption of a permanent rule would be contrary to public interest.(6) "Kit homes" means any structures intended for residential use that are comprised of prefabricated walls, floors, and roofs which are assembled on-site and are 800 square feet or smaller in size.(7) "Model codes" means the codes developed by the model code organizations and adopted by reference in RCW 19.27.031.(((7)))(8) "Model code organizations" means the national code-adopting organizations that develop the model codes, as defined in this section, such as the international code council, international association of plumbing and mechanical officials, and national fire protection association.(((8)))(9) "Multifamily residential building" means common wall residential buildings that consist of four or fewer units, that do not exceed two stories in height, that are less than 5,000 square feet in area, and that have a one-hour fire-resistive occupancy separation between units.(((9)))(10) "Off-cycle amendments" means amendments to the state building code outside of the three-year state building code adoption cycle.(((10)))(11) "Residential building permit" means a building permit issued by a city or a county to construct, enlarge, alter, repair, move, demolish, or change the occupancy of any building containing only dwelling units used for independent living of one or more persons including permanent provisions for living, sleeping, eating, cooking, and sanitation, and structures accessory to dwelling units, such as detached garages and storage buildings.(((11)))(12) "State building code" means the codes adopted and amended by the council as follows:(a) The codes referenced in this chapter;(b) The state energy code referenced in chapter 19.27A RCW; and(c) Any other codes so designated by the Washington state legislature as adopted and amended by the council.(((12)))(13) "State building code adoption cycle" means that period during which the state building code is adopted, updated, and amended by the council.(((13)))(14) "Statewide amendment" means any amendment to the state building code initiated through council action or by petition to the council from any agency, city, county, or interested individual or organization, that would have the effect of amending the state building code for the entire state of Washington. A statewide amendment may have a regional effect.(((14)))(15) "Temporary growing structure" means a structure that has the roof covered with polyethylene, polyvinyl, or similar flexible synthetic material and is used to provide plants with either frost protection or increased heat retention.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 19.27 RCW to read as follows:(1) The state building code council is instructed to perform rule making on the state building codes applicable to kit homes no later than March 31, 2027.(2) The state building code council may update the state building codes applicable to kit homes.--- END ---